en: isomaltulose is a source of glucose and fructose
bg: изомалтулозата е източник на глюкоза и фруктоза
da: isomaltulose er en kilde til glucose og fruktose
de: Isomaltulose ist eine Quelle von Glukose und Fruktose
es: la isomaltulosa es una fuente de glucosa y fructosa
fi: isomaltuloosi on glukoosin ja fruktoosin lähde
fr: l'isomaltulose est une source de glucose et de fructose
hr: izomaltuloza je izvor glukoze i fruktoze
it: la isomaltulosio è una fonte di glucosio e fruttosio
nl: isomaltulose is een bron van glucose en fructose
pl: izomaltuloza jest źródłem glukozy i fruktozy
se: isomaltulos är en källa till glukos och fruktos
sv: isomaltulos är en källa till glukos och fruktos
zh: 异麦芽酮糖是葡萄糖和果糖的来源

en: source of fibre
xx: source of fibre
ar: مصدر للألياف
bg: източник на влакнини
ca: Font de fibra
cs: Zdroj vlákniny
da: Fiberkilde
de: Ballaststoffquelle
el: Πηγή φυτικών ινών
es: Fuente de fibra alimentaria
et: Kiudaine allikas
fi: Kuidun lähde
fr: Source de fibres alimentaires, Source de fibres, Source naturelle de fibres
he: מקור לסיבים תזונתיים
hr: izvor vlakana
hu: Rostforrás
it: Fonte di fibre
ja: 食物繊維源
ko: 섬유질 공급원
lt: Skaidulų šaltinis
lv: Šķiedrvielu avots
nl: Bron van vezels
no: Kilde til fiber
pl: Źródło błonnika
pt: Fonte de fibra
ro: Sursă de fibre
ru: Источник клетчатки
sk: Zdroj vlákniny
sl: Vir vlaknin
sq: Burim i fibrave
sr: Izvor vlakana
sv: Källa till fiber, Fiberkälla
th: แหล่งของใยอาหาร
tr: Lif kaynağı
uk: Джерело клітковини
zh: 纤维来源

en: High fibres, high fibers, Rich in fiber, high fiber
xx: High fibres
bg: Високо съдържание на хранителни влакнини
ca: Alt en fibra, ric en fibra
da: rig på fibre
de: ballaststoffreich
es: Rico en fibra, Rico en fibras, Fuente de Fibra, Alto en Fibra, Alto Contenido en Fibra
fi: runsaskuituinen, paljon kuituja, kuitupitoinen
fr: Riche en fibres, Naturellement riches en fibres
he: עתיר בסיבים תזונתיים
hr: visoko obogaćena vlaknima
hu: Rostokban gazdag, Magas rosttartalmú
it: Ricco di fibre, Ad alto contenuto di fibre
nb: Fiberrik, rik på fiber
nl: Vezelrijk, Rijk aan vezels
pl: wysoka zawartość błonnika
pt: Rico em fibras, teor elevado de fibras, teor elevado em fibras, alto teor em fibra, alto teor em fibras
ro: Високо съдържание на хранителни влакнини
ru: Обогащено клетчаткой
sv: Fiberrik, Rik på fiber, Fiberrikt
th: ใยอาหารสูง
zh: 高膳食纤维

en: Omega-3
xx: Omega-3
bg: Омега-3
fi: Omega-3, Omega-3-rasvahapot
he: אומגה 3
nl: Omega 3
pt: Ómega-3, ómega 3
ru: омега-3 жиры, омега-3
th: โอเมกา 3
zh: Omega-3

en: source of omega-3, source of omega-3 fatty acids
xx: source of omega-3
bg: Натурален източник на омега-3 мастни киселини
it: sorgente di omega 3, sorgente di omega-3, sorgente di omega3
zh: Omega-3来源

en: High in Omega 3, Rich in Omega 3, high omega-3 fatty acids
xx: High in Omega 3
bg: Богато на Омега-3, Натурално високо съдържание на омега-3 мастни киселини
ca: Alt en Omega 3, Ric en Omega 3
de: Hoher Omega-3-Gehalt
es: Rico en Omega 3, Alto en Omega 3, Alto contenido de ácidos grasos OMEGA 3
fi: runsaasti omega-3-rasvahappoja, paljon omega-3-rasvahappoja
fr: Riche en Oméga-3, Riche en omega 3, Riche en acide gras omega 3
he: עשיר באומגה 3
hr: visoka vsebnost omega-3 maščob, izvor omega-3 masnih kiselina, bogato omega-3 masnim kiselinama
hu: Omega-3 zsírsavakban gazdag
it: Alto contenuto di Omega 3, ricco di omega 3
nl: Rijk aan Omega 3
pt: Rico em Ómega 3, Rico em Ómega-3
ru: Обогащено омега-3 жирами
sr: Bogata Omega-3 masnim kiselinama
zh: 高Omega-3

en: high monounsaturated fat
xx: high monounsaturated fat
zh: 高单不饱和脂肪

en: Rich in unsaturated fatty acids, high unsaturated fat
xx: Rich in unsaturated fatty acids
de: reich an ungesättigten fettsäuren
es: rico en ácidos grasos insaturados
fr: riche en acides gras insaturés
hr: bogat nezasićenim masnim kiselinama
it: ricco di acidi grassi insaturi
nl: rijk aan onverzadigde vetzuren
pt: rico em ácidos graxos insaturados
zh: 富含不饱和脂肪酸

en: Rich in polyunsaturated fatty acids, high polyunsaturated fat
xx: Rich in polyunsaturated fatty acids
de: Reich an mehrfach ungesättigten Fettsäuren
es: Con valiosos ácidos grasos poliinsaturados, Rico en ácidos grasos poliinsaturados, Alto en ácidos grasos poliinsaturados
fi: Runsaasti monityydyttymättömiä rasvahappoja
fr: Riche en acides gras polyinsaturés
hu: Többszörösen telítetlen zsírsavakban gazdag
it: Ricca di acidi grassi polinsaturi
nl: Rijk aan poly-onverzadigde vetzuren
pt: Rico em gordura poli-insaturada
zh: 富含多不饱和脂肪酸

en: Source of proteins, source of protein, good source of protein
xx: Source of proteins
bg: Източник на белтъчини, Натурален източник на белтък
ca: Font de proteïna
de: proteinquelle
es: Fuente de proteínas
fi: Proteiinin lähde
fr: source de protéines
hr: izvor proteina, izvor bjelančevina
it: fonte di proteine
pt: fonte de proteínas
sv: källa till protein
zh: 蛋白质来源

en: High proteins, high protein content
xx: High proteins
ca: Alt en proteïnes
da: Proteinrig
de: Proteinreich, hoher Eiweissgehalt
es: Alto en proteinas, Rico en Proteinas
fi: Runsasproteiininen, Paljon proteiineja, Proteiinipitoinen, Runsaasti proteiinia
fr: Riche en protéines
he: עשיר בחלבונים
hr: bogato bjelančevinama
hu: Magas fehérjetartalom, Fehérjékben gazdag
it: Alto contenuto proteico, Ricco di proteine, Ricco in proteine
nb: Rik på protein
nl: Eiwitrijk, Rijk aan protéines, Rijk aan Eiwit
pl: Wysoka zawartość białka, Bogaty w białko
pt: Proteínas altas
ru: Обогащено протеинами
sv: Proteinrik, rik på protein, högt proteininnehåll
th: โปรตีนสูง
zh: 高蛋白质

en: Rich in vegetable protein
ca: Ric en proteïna vegetal
de: Reich an pflanzlichem Eiweiß
es: Rico en proteínas vegetal
fi: Runsaasti kasviproteiinia
fr: Riche en protéines végétales
hu: Növényi fehérjékben gazdag
it: Ricca di proteini vegetali
nl: Rijk aan plantaardige eiwitten
pt: Rico em proteínas vegetais, rico em proteína vegetal

en: Calcium source, Source of calcium, With calcium
xx: Calcium source
bg: Източник на калции
ca: Font de calci
de: Kalziumquelle, mit Calcium
es: Fuente de calcio
fi: Kalsiumin lähde, Sisältää kalsiumia
fr: Source de calcium
he: מקור לסידן
hr: izvor kalcija
hu: Kalciumforrás
it: Fonte di calcio
nl: Bron van Calcium
pl: Źródło wapnia
pt: Fonte de cálcio
ru: источник кальция
sv: Källa till kalcium
th: แหล่งของแคลเซียม
zh: 钙来源

en: magnesium source, source of magnesium
xx: magnesium source
bg: Източник на магнезий
ca: Font de magnesi
de: magnesiumquelle
es: Fuente de magnesio
fi: magnesiumin lähde
fr: source de magnésium
hr: izvor magnezija
hu: magnéziumforrás
it: fonte di magnesio
nl: bron van magnesium
pl: Źródło magnezu
pt: Fonte de magnésio
ru: источник магния
th: แหล่งแมกนีเซียม
zh: 镁来源

en: zinc source, source of zinc
xx: zinc source
it: fonte di zinco

en: iodine source, source of iodine
xx: iodine source

en: Phosphore source
xx: Phosphore source
bg: Източник на фосфор
ca: Font de fòsfor
de: Phosphorquelle
es: Fuente de fósforo
fi: fosforin lähde
fr: Source de phosphore
hu: Foszforforrás
it: Fonte di fosforo
nl: Bron van fosfor
pt: Fonte de fósforo
ru: Источник фосфора
th: แหล่งโฟสฟอรัส

en: Vitamin A source, Source of vitamin A
xx: Vitamin A source
bg: Източник на витамин А
ca: Font de vitamina A
de: Vitamin A-Quelle
es: Fuente de vitamina A
fi: A-vitamiinin lähde
fr: Source de vitamine A
he: מקור לוויטמין A
hr: izvor vitamina A
hu: A-vitaminforrás
it: Fonte di vitamina A
nl: bron van Vitamine A
pl: Źródło witaminy A
pt: Fonte de vitamina A
ru: Источник витамина A
sv: Källa till vitamin A
tr: A Vitamini kaynağı

en: Vitamin B source, Source of vitamin B
bg: Източник на витамин B
de: Vitamin B-Quelle
es: Fuente de vitamina B
fi: B-vitamiinin lähde
fr: Source de vitamine B
he: מקור לוויטמין B
hr: izvor vitamina B
hu: B-vitaminforrás
it: fonte di vitamina B
nl: Bron van Vitamine B
pl: Źródło witaminy B
pt: Fonte de vitamina B
ru: Источник витамина B
sv: Källa till vitamin B

en: Vitamin B1 source, Source of vitamin B1
bg: Източник на витамин B1
de: Vitamin B1-Quelle
es: Fuente de vitamina B1
fi: B1-vitamiinin lähde
fr: Source de vitamine B1
he: מקור לוויטמין B1
hr: izvor vitamina B1
hu: B1-vitaminforrás
it: fonte di vitamina B1
nl: Bron van Vitamine B1
pl: Źródło witaminy B1
pt: Fonte de vitamina B1
ru: Источник витамина B1
sv: Källa till vitamin B1